src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON VUONATCT !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Nom:»t K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+SgNomCmp:»t R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Ess:»gin K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»g%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Gen:»ga K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+SgGenCmp:»ga R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Gen+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:»t K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Gen+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»g%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc:»ga K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:»t K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»g%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom:»gat K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Ill+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gasa%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Ill:»gij K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc:»gis K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:»gin K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Com:»gijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Com+Use/Sub:»gijnna K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Gen:»gijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+PlGenCmp:»gijd R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Acc:»gijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Ill:»gijdda K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc:»gijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:»gijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:»gijnna K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Com:»gijgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»gij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gistti%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Com+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Gen+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Acc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Ill+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gijddás%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Com+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»gijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Ess:»hin K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»h%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Gen:»ha K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+SgGenCmp:»ha R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Gen+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»h%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc:»ha K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»h%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom:»hat K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Ill+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hasa%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Ill:»hij K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc:»his K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:»hin K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Com:»hijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Com+Use/Sub:»hijnna K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Gen:»hijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+PlGenCmp:»hijd R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Acc:»hijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Ill:»hijdda K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc:»hijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:»hijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:»hijnna K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Com:»hijgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»hij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»histti%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Com+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Gen+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Acc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Ill+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hijddás%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Com+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped:»hijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;

LEXICON ACTORder  !!= * __@CODE@__ +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG 
 +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG: ACTORderCT ;

LEXICON ACTORderCT  !!= * __@CODE@__ Long compound-forms
 +N: GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Ped: Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;
 +N: EssV ;
 +N:X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon, u-stem
! +N+Use/Sub: GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Use/Sub:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px

!LEXICON ACTORLONGSHORTder !+CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG !Sometimes long compound-forms not in use now
! +N: GOAHTILONGSHORTCMP ;
! +N+Sg+Nom: K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped: Px3V ; !^P^
! +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
!! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
! +N: EssV ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalNounsV ; !not plausible
! +N:X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
! +N:X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +N+Use/Sub: GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +N:X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
! +N+Use/Sub:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
! +N:%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
! +N:X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N:X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)


LEXICON ACTORTVder  !!= * __@CODE@__ +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG +CmpN/SgLeft +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
 +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft: ACTORTVderCT ;

LEXICON ACTORTVderCT !!= * __@CODE@__
 +N+SgNomCmp: R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped: Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;
 +N: EssV ;
 +N:X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +N+Use/Sub: GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Use/Sub:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalNounsV ; !not plausible

LEXICON ACTORSHORTTVder !!= * __@CODE@__
 +N+CmpN/SgN@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;
 +N+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped: Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N: EssV ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalNounsV ; !not plausible
 +N:X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:X4 Px3V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:X4 Px3V ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:X4st%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:X4k K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp+Use/NG+Use/Sub: R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +N+Use/Sub:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N:X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)


!! !!!Adjective derivation
! - - - - - - - - - -


LEXICON LAS !!= * __@CODE@__
 :%> ATTR ;  ! To capture the attributive forms before going to N lexica.
+Use/-Spell: VUOHTA ;
 MUSH ;

LEXICON LEXMUSH !!= * __@CODE@__
 +N: MUSH ;

LEXICON MUSH   !!= * __@CODE@__ Deverbal nouns
 : JOHTOLAT0 ;
 :a MUSSHA ;
! +Der/viđi+Adv:»X7#viđi K ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7#viđá K ;

LEXICON MUSSHA !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> PxV ;
 +Ess:%>n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Ped:%>n%> PxC ;
 :%> LASJOBL ;

LEXICON BUOREMUSS !!= * __@CODE@__
 : BUOREMUS ;

LEXICON BUOREMUS !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Attr:%> K ; ! Attributive superlatives
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! JOHTOLAT0 ; !replaced to avoid compound
! VUOHTA ;
 :a%> BUOREMUSSA- ;

LEXICON BUOREMUSSA- !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:X8t K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub: PxV ;
 +Ess+Use/Sub:n%> PxC ;
 EABBUCASE2 ;

LEXICON LEXDIMINC !!= * __@CODE@__
! +N:X4 DIMINC ;
 +N:%> DIMINC ;

LEXICON DIMINC !!= * __@CODE@__
 MALIS0 ;
 MALLAS- ;

LEXICON DIMINV !!= * __@CODE@__
 JOHTOLAT0 ;
 :a%> JOHTOLAHKA- ;

LEXICON HEAPMI !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:X1 K ;
 +Sg+Nom:X7 K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub: PxV ;
 HEAPMIOBL ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:X8t K ;

LEXICON LAGAN !!= * __@CODE@__
+v2+Use/NG:lágán LAGAN_LAGAS ;
+v1:lágan LAGAN_LAGAS ;

LEXICON LAGAS !!= * __@CODE@__
+v2:lágáž LAGAN_LAGAS ;
+v1:lágaž LAGAN_LAGAS ;
