src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
fuođđolágan:fuođđo# LAGAN ;
fuođđolágaš:fuođđo# LAGAS ;
bággolonistanlágan:bággo#lonistan# LAGAN ;
bággolonistanlágaš:bággo#lonistan# LAGAS ;
vearrolágan:vearro# LAGAN ;
fanaslágaš:fanas# LAGAS ;
rocklágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rock# LAGAS ;
šlahttelágan:šlahtte# LAGAN ;
iežatlágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežat# LAGAN ;
iežasetlágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežaset# LAGAN ;
iehčamelágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iehčame# LAGAS ;
rivgolágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rivgo# LAGAS ;
mulágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mu# LAGAN ;
dudnolágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dudno# LAGAN ;
juoppálágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:juoppá# LAGAS ;
minlágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:min# LAGAS ;
dákkárlágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dákkár# LAGAN ;
duokkárgelágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duokkárge# LAGAN ;
diekkárlágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:diekkár# LAGAS ;
albmalágaš:albma# LAGAS ;
dálálágan:dálá# LAGAN ;
eŋgellágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:eŋgel# LAGAN ;
sevdnjeslágan:sevdnjes# LAGAN ;
alitlágan:alit# LAGAN ;
láhkalágan:láhka# LAGAN ;
lávvolágan:lávvo# LAGAN ;
hirbmatlágan:hirbmat# LAGAN ;
feaskkirlágan:feaskkir# LAGAN ;
esseijalágan:esseija# LAGAN ;
evttohuslágan:evttohus# LAGAN ;
ipmilbálvaluslágan:ipmil#bálvalus# LAGAN ;
ruovdelágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruovde# LAGAN ;
giellalágan:giella# LAGAN ;
jallaslágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jallas# LAGAS ;
vuoraslágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuoras# LAGAS ;
sevdnjeslágaš:sevdnjes# LAGAS ;
alitlágaš:alit# LAGAS ;
láhkalágaš:láhka# LAGAS ;
lávvolágaš:lávvo# LAGAS ;
hirbmatlágaš:hirbmat# LAGAS ;
feaskkirlágaš:feaskkir# LAGAS ;
esseijalágaš:esseija# LAGAS ;
evttohuslágaš:evttohus# LAGAS ;
ipmilbálvaluslágaš:ipmil#bálvalus# LAGAS ;
ruovdelágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruovde# LAGAS ;
giellalágaš:giella# LAGAS ;
diskalágaš:diska# LAGAS ;
juohkelágaš:juohke# LAGAS ;
almennetlágan:almennet# LAGAN ;
boareslágaš:boares# LAGAS ;
boaššumus+A+Superl:boaššumuss BUOREMUSS ;
báhpárlágan:báhpár# LAGAN ;
davimuš+A+Superl:davimušš BUOREMUSS ;
amaslágan:amas# LAGAN ;
fávllimus+A+Superl:fávllimuss BUOREMUSS ;
fávllimuš+A+Superl:fávllimužž BUOREMUSS ;
gaskkamus+A+Superl:gaskkamuss BUOREMUS ;
gaskkamuš+A+Superl:gaskkamušš BUOREMUSS ;
gaskkamuš+A+Superl:gaskkamužž BUOREMUSS ;
goahccelágan:goahcce# LAGAN ;
iešguhtetlágan:ieš#guhtet9# LAGAN ;
lagamus+A+Superl:lagamuss BUOREMUSS ;
lagamuš+A+Superl:lagamušš BUOREMUSS ;
lagamuš+A+Superl:lagamužž BUOREMUSS ;
lieggalágaš:liegga# LAGAS ;
loaiddumuš+A+Superl:loaiddumužž BUOREMUSS ;
lulimuš+A+Superl:lulimužž BUOREMUSS ;
luonddulágan:luonddu# LAGAN ;
maŋit+A+Superl+Use/Sub:manjimuss BUOREMUSS ;
maŋit+A+Superl:maŋimuss BUOREMUSS ;
maŋit+A+Superl:maŋimužž BUOREMUSS ;
maŋit+A+Superl:maŋemuss BUOREMUSS ;
maŋit+A+Superl:maŋemužž BUOREMUSS ;
mearamuš+A+Superl:mearamužž BUOREMUSS ;
muhtinlágan:muhtin# LAGAN ;
máttimuš+A+Superl:máttimužž BUOREMUSS ;
nuorttamus+A+Superl:nuorttamuss BUOREMUSS ;
nuorttamuš+A+Superl:nuorttamužž BUOREMUSS ;
nuorttimus+A+Superl:nuorttimuss BUOREMUSS ;
oarjjimuš+A+Superl:oarjjimužž BUOREMUSS ;
olbmolágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:olmmoš# LAGAN ;
olggumuš+A+Superl:olggumužž BUOREMUSS ;
ovddemus+A+Superl:ovddemuss BUOREMUSS ;
ovddemuš+A+Superl:ovddemužž BUOREMUSS ;
ovddimus+A+Superl:ovddimuss BUOREMUSS ;
ovddimuš+A+Superl:ovddimužž BUOREMUSS ;
ravddamus+A+Superl:ravddamuss BUOREMUSS ;
ravddamuš+A+Superl:ravddamužž BUOREMUSS ;
rittumuš+A+Superl:rittumužž BUOREMUSS ;
sierralágan:sierra# LAGAN ;
sokkimuš+A+Superl:sokkimužž BUOREMUSS ;
sáhpánlágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sáhpán# LAGAN ;
uvssamuš+A+Superl:uvssamužž BUOREMUSS ;
vearámus+A+Superl:vearámuss BUOREMUS ;
vuolemus+A+Superl:vuolemuss BUOREMUSS ;
vuonamuš+A+Superl:vuonamužž BUOREMUSS ;
vuosttimuš+A+Superl:vuosttimužž BUOREMUSS ;
várimuš+A+Superl:várimužž BUOREMUSS ;
áigeguovdil+A+Superl+Use/NG:áige#guovdilaččamuss BUOREMUS ;
bábirlágaš:bábir# LAGAS ;
fearalágaš:feara# LAGAS ;
juogalágaš:juoga# LAGAS ;
iežálágaš:iežá# LAGAS ;
oatnelágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oatne# LAGAS; !
sierralágaš:sierra# LAGAS ;
unnislágaš:unnis# LAGAS ;
sierátlágan:sierát# LAGAN ;
jiešguhtetlágaš:jieš#guhtet9# LAGAS ;
jiežasetlágan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežaset# LAGAN ;
jiežadelágaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežade# LAGAS ;
